Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 3 Administrative Procedure
§ 16-3-107.
Contested cases; general procedure.

In any contested case, all parties shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing after reasonable notice served personally or by mail. Where the indispensable and necessary parties are composed of a large class, the notice shall be served upon a reasonable number thereof as representatives of the class or by giving notice by publication in the manner specified by the rules or an order of the agency.

The notice shall include a statement of:

The time, place and nature of the hearing;

The legal authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held;

The particular sections of the statutes and rules involved;

A short and plain statement of the matters asserted. If the agency or other party is unable to state the matters in detail at the time the notice is served, the initial notice may be limited to a statement of the issues involved, and thereafter upon application a more definite and detailed statement shall be furnished.

In all contested cases, depositions and discovery relating thereto, agencies shall have the authority to administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses and require the production of any books, papers or other documents relevant or material to the inquiry. In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued by the agency in a contested case, deposition or discovery relating thereto, to any person, the district court for the district in which the hearing or deposition or other proceeding is being conducted, or for the district where the person may be served, may upon application by the agency issue to the person refusing to obey the subpoena an order requiring the person to show cause for the refusal or to appear before the agency or other person designated by it there to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or there to give evidence touching the matter in question. Any failure to show cause or obey the order of court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

In all contested cases the agency shall as part of its rules of practice provide that the agency or one (1) of its presiding officers designated by it upon application of any party shall issue a subpoena requiring the appearance of witnesses for the purpose of taking evidence or requiring the production of any books, papers or other documents relevant or material to the inquiry.

The agency upon motion made promptly and in any event at or before the time specified in the subpoena for compliance therewith, may quash or modify the subpoena if it is unreasonable and oppressive, or in the event issued pursuant to subsection (g) of this section may condition denial of the motion upon the advancement by the person in whose behalf the subpoena is issued of the reasonable cost of producing the books, papers, documents or tangible things.

If a subpoena issued pursuant to this section is disobeyed and if the agency fails to apply pursuant to subsection (c) of this section for enforcement any party may apply to the district court for the district having venue under subsection (c) of this section for enforcement pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

In all contested cases the taking of depositions and discovery shall be available to the parties in accordance with the provisions of Rules 26, 28 through 37 (excepting Rule 37(b)(1) and 37(b)(2)(A)(vii) therefrom) of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure in effect on the date of the enactment of this act and any subsequent rule amendments thereto. All references therein to the “court” shall be deemed to refer to the appropriate “agency”; all references to the use of the subpoena power shall be references to subsection (c) of this section; all references to “trial” shall be deemed references to “hearing”; all references to “plaintiff” shall be deemed references to “a party”. If a party or other witness refuses to be sworn or refuses to answer any question after being directed to do so by the agency in which the action is pending, the refusal to obey the agency order shall be enforced in the same manner as is provided in subsection (c) of this section.

Any agency which is a party to the contested case is subject to the discovery provisions of this section but neither the agency, nor any member, officer or employee shall be required to disclose information which is confidential or privileged under the law and no member of the presiding agency shall be compelled to testify or give a deposition in a contested case. Discovery sought from the agency initially shall be by written application. If the agency refuses to allow discovery in whole or in part the aggrieved party may apply to the presiding officer for an order compelling discovery. If the presiding officer fails or refuses to compel discovery, the aggrieved party may apply to the district court for the district in which the hearing, deposition or other proceeding is being or is to be conducted for an order directed to the agency compelling discovery. The presiding officer or district court shall enter such order as may be appropriate.

Opportunity shall be afforded all parties to respond and present evidence and argument on all issues involved. Any person compelled to appear in person before any agency or representative thereof shall be accorded the right to be accompanied, represented and advised by counsel or, if permitted by the agency, by other qualified representative.

Every party shall be accorded the right to appear in person or by or with counsel or other duly qualified representative in any agency proceeding in accordance with such rules as the agency prescribes and the pertinent rules of the supreme court of Wyoming. So far as the orderly conduct of public business permits, any interested person may appear before any agency or its responsible officers or employees for the presentation, adjustment or determination of any issue, request or controversy in any proceeding (interlocutory, summary or otherwise) or in connection with any agency function. Every agency shall proceed with reasonable dispatch to conclude any matter presented to it except that due regard shall be had for the convenience and necessity of the parties or their representatives. Any person representing an agency at a hearing in a contested case in which the agency is a party shall not in the same case serve as presiding officer or provide ex parte advice regarding the case to the presiding officer or to the body or any member of the body comprising the decision makers.

No process, requirement of a report, inspection, or other investigative act or demand shall be issued, made or enforced in any manner or for any purpose except as authorized by law. Every person compelled to submit data or evidence is entitled to retain or, on payment of lawfully prescribed costs, procure a copy of a transcript thereof, except that in a nonpublic investigatory proceeding the witness may for good cause be limited to inspection of the official transcript of his testimony.

Unless precluded by law, informal disposition may be made of any contested case by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent order or default.

The record in a contested case must include:

All formal or informal notices, pleadings, motions and intermediate rulings;

Evidence received or considered including matters officially noticed;

Questions and offers of proof, objections and rulings thereon;

Any proposed findings and exceptions thereto;

Any opinion, findings, decision or order of the agency and any report by the officer presiding at the hearing.

In all contested cases the proceeding including all testimony shall be reported verbatim stenographically or by any other appropriate means determined by the agency or the officer presiding at the hearing.

Oral proceedings or any part thereof shall be transcribed on request of any party upon payment of the cost thereof.

Findings of fact shall be based exclusively on the evidence and matters officially noticed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.25; Laws 1974, ch. 7, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-4-107

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 16, § 1; 1993, ch. 105, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (g), substituted “Rule 37 (b)(1)
and 37(b)(2)(A)(vii)” for “Rule 37(b)(1) and 37(b)(2)(D)”
preceding “therefrom.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-3-101(b)(xi).

Vague and indefinite charges unconstitutional. —

For a contestant to have to defend against vague and indefinite charges is a denial of not only his rights under this section, but also a constitutional denial of due process. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Giving advice to board. —

In a case
where the establishment of a private road was sought, a hearing officer
did not violate this section by giving legal opinions or advice to
a county board of commissioners because the board was not a party
in this matter. Price Family Trust v. Hutchinson, 2014 WY 162, 340 P.3d 1002,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2014).

Complete record to be kept. —

In a case where the establishment of a private road was sought, a final decision
was not set aside due to malfunctioning audio equipment where the record included a transcript of testimony and other evidence submitted. It was not alleged or shown how having a full transcript of duplicate sessions of deliberations was critical to appellate review. Price Family Trust v. Hutchinson, 2014 WY 162, 340 P.3d 1002,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2014).

Whatever puts party on inquiry amounts to constitutional “notice.”

White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1107, 103 S. Ct. 732, 74 L. Ed. 2d 956, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 2894 (U.S. 1983).

Expeditious settlement of matters required of agencies. —

It is the duty of every agency controlled by this chapter to settle the matters before it as expediently as possible, with regard to maintaining a party's right to a full and fair hearing. Wyoming Bd. of Equalization v. State, 637 P.2d 248,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1981).

Rule 15 (b), W.R.C.P. applicable to administrative proceeding. —

Rule 15(b), W.R.C.P., which pertains to amending the pleadings so that they conform to the evidence, is applicable to an administrative proceeding. White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1107, 103 S. Ct. 732, 74 L. Ed. 2d 956, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 2894 (U.S. 1983).

Failure to request continuance based on surprise precludes prejudice contention on appeal. —

Even if a party genuinely feels that he is surprised by the evidence, and it is not reflected in the charges, the failure to request a continuance on the ground of surprise precludes him from contending on appeal that he was prejudiced. White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1107, 103 S. Ct. 732, 74 L. Ed. 2d 956, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 2894 (U.S. 1983).

Failure to object waives right to present argument. —

Although subsection (j) of this section provides an opportunity for a party to present argument, a party's failure to assert its right to utilize that opportunity by objecting amounts to both a waiver and invited error. Pacific Power & Light v. Heermann, 872 P.2d 1171,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1994).

Failure to make basic findings of fact. —

Medical Commission Hearing Panel's order denying the claimant workers' compensation benefits for gastrointestinal problems violated the Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act by failing to make basic findings of fact that supported its ultimate findings; the decision cited no evidence or medical opinions and made no basic findings to support its conclusion that the claimant's condition changed substantially after August 2002 or to explain the conclusion that had the narcotic pain medications been responsible for the esophageal stricture, it would have appeared earlier. Olivas v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Workers Comp. Claim), 2006 WY 29, 130 P.3d 476,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2006).

Concept of burden of proof recognized in administrative hearing. —

Although, with respect to the matter of burden of proof, no mention of it is made in this chapter, the concept of burden of proof has its place in an administrative proceeding. Pan Am. Petroleum Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 446 P.2d 550,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1968).

Burden of proving arbitrary, illegal or fraudulent administrative action is on the complainant,

and this burden includes not only clear presentation of the question but also placement of evidence in the record to sustain the complainant's position. Wyoming Bancorporation v. Bonham, 527 P.2d 432,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1974).

Complete record to be kept. —

Both the Administrative Procedure Act and §

35-12-113

of the Industrial Development Information and Siting Act require the keeping of a complete record. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

Verbatim reporting requirement. —

An appeals court set aside an agency's action, findings, and conclusions where the agency violated the verbatim reporting requirements of subsection (p) of this section by failing to tape record a license revocation hearing after the licensee detrimentally relied on the agency's advance assurance that the hearing would be tape recorded. State Elec. Bd. v. Hansen, 928 P.2d 482,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1996).

Board of county commissioners'
public hearings did not become a de facto contested case “trial-type” proceeding, as defined in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-101(b)(ii), necessitating a verbatim record under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-107(p), because the board did not determine a legal right in its proceeding concerning a property owner's variance request.
Gilbert v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2010 WY 68, 232 P.3d 17,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2010).

Transcript of the proceeding must be made available to any party

upon request and payment of costs. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

Fair hearing enjoyed where full participation by all parties. —

A mortgage insurance company enjoyed a fair hearing to determine whether the approval previously given to policies should be withdrawn where it participated to the extent that it deemed desirable without any attempt made to inhibit the testimony of witnesses or arguments of counsel, where all pertinent testimony was introduced and where the insurance commissioner participated patiently in hearing lengthy testimony. Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

Full review of factual and legal issues. —

The department of family services rule that limits the issues in a contested hearing to a determination of whether the agency acted in accordance with the law or its own rules does not comply with this chapter because it prevents the department from conducting a full review of the factual issues at the contested hearing. JM v. Department of Family Servs., 922 P.2d 219,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1996).

The Wyoming supreme court was unable to meaningfully review an order issued by the board of county commissioners of Teton County denying application for a grading permit that would have permitted the construction of a driveway, because the board's hearing was conducted as a legislative hearing and the final order contained only a single conclusion with no findings as to the underlying facts. Frankel v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 13, 39 P.3d 420,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2002).

Violation where notice and participation denied. —

The state board of equalization violated a taxpayer's procedural due process rights and its rights under the statute when it addressed the factual issues regarding the propriety of the taxpayer's allocation of production without giving the taxpayer notice of its intent to consider the issues and an opportunity to present evidence and argument in support of its position. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 7 P.3d 900,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. Aug. 3, 2000).

Violation where participation denied. —

In a contested case proceeding, the State Board of Equalization violated the natural gas processing and production company's procedural due process rights in an administrative proceeding by depriving the company of an opportunity to participate. The board remanded the case to the department of revenue for adoption of a more determinative formula for computation of comparable value based upon reasonable inferences from third-party natural gas processing fees without allowing the company to participate. Because the formula depended upon factual ascertainment in order to properly compute those taxes, the nonparticipating company was deprived of its due process rights. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 882 P.2d 866,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1994).

Applicability where weapon permit denied. —

Neither the concealed weapon statute nor the Administrative Procedures Act contains a requirement for a hearing where an application for a concealed weapon permit is denied. The concealed weapon statute allows an aggrieved applicant the opportunity to rebut the department of criminal investigation's findings and conclusions through a request for reconsideration. The Administrative Procedures Act requires only a hearing for contested cases where legal rights exist which are to be determined after an opportunity for a trial-type rehearing. The defendant failed to identify any such right. King v. Wyo. Div. of Crim. Investigation, 2004 WY 52, 89 P.3d 341,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2004).

Administrative hearing not inherently flawed by double-agency presence. —

Absent on-the-record demonstration of prejudice of some sort or that ex parte influence was unduly exercised, an administrative hearing wherein both the prosecutor and hearing officer came from the same state agency is not fatally flawed per se. State Transp. Comm'n v. Ford, 844 P.2d 496,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1992).

Department of revenue and taxation is not required to appear

either personally or through an attorney in an implied consent driver's license suspension hearing. It may submit its case by certified record on the refusal form given to the licensee at the time of his arrest. Drake v. State, 751 P.2d 1319,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1988).

Appearance of impropriety. —

The contacts between the board of medicine and its attorney violated subsection (k) and contributed to the overall appearance of unfairness regarding the proceedings. Painter v. Abels, 998 P.2d 931,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2000).

Proper method to enforce taking of deposition. —

The provision of subsection (c) for judicial enforcement of a subpoena justifies the enforcement of a subpoena only, and nothing else, including a notice of deposition, may be the subject of an enforcement proceeding in the district court. The proper method for initiating an enforceable effort to take a deposition is for the agency to issue a subpoena to the witness. Then, and only then, if the witness does not appear or refuses to testify, the agency may invoke the assistance of the judicial branch of government in the enforcement proceeding. In re Contempt Order Issued Against Anderson, 765 P.2d 933,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1988).

Proper procedure to challenge discovery decision. —

The proper procedure to challenge a refusal by the presiding officer to allow discovery is to apply to the district court rather than to wait until the matter is decided and then raise discovery as an issue on appeal. Dorr v. State Bd., 2001 WY 37, 21 P.3d 735,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2001).

Basis for findings. —

In determining whether to grant a conditional use permit to allow for off-street parking in a high-density residential zone, information regarding traffic in the area was not information of which the court could take official notice where it was not based on: (1) cognizable facts in the formal evidence of the case, or (2) technical or scientific facts within the commission's specialized knowledge. Heiss v. City of Casper Planning & Zoning Comm'n, 941 P.2d 27,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1997).

Contract used as evidence to support findings. —

An administrative agency, while prohibited from settling or adjudicating rights under a contract, may use a contract as evidence to support its findings or to refute a party's position. The agency's interpretation of the contract will be subject to judicial review if a party claims error. Preferred Energy Properties v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 890 P.2d 1110,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1995).

Purpose in minds of legislators when they included “any proposed findings” in record

was that it is by this vehicle that an appellant can frame issues clearly, specifically and precisely, and thereafter cast upon the administrative body the burden of the specific issue he deems decisive. Wyoming Bancorporation v. Bonham, 527 P.2d 432,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1974).

Employee's testimony improperly limited. —

Wyoming Medical Commission erred under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-107(j) in limiting an employee's testimony to matters not discussed in a discovery deposition taken by the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division; by failing to object, however, the employee waived the right to appeal the issue.
Morris v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2012 WY 71, 276 P.3d 399,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(May 22, 2012).

Mayor authorized to summarily discharge police chief. —

The mayor of Newcastle had the authority under the law to discharge the chief of police without council approval and without a hearing. Carlson v. Bratton, 681 P.2d 1333,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1984).

Substantial evidence to support termination. —

There was substantial evidence to support the personnel commission's decision that an employee was not wrongfully terminated and was not deprived of due process, as he obviously had notice that the city was referring to personal e-mails the employee sent to his wife when it referred, in its notice of termination, to non-work related activities being performed during work hours. Davis v. City of Cheyenne, 2004 WY 43, 88 P.3d 481,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. May 18, 2004).

Notice and hearing afforded. —

Licensee afforded notice and an opportunity to be heard. Roush v. Pari-Mutuel Comm'n, 917 P.2d 1133,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1996).

Court review of disciplinary suspension. —

The district court has jurisdiction to review the disciplinary suspension of a police officer where the rules and regulations of the police department's civil service commission provide that an officer may petition the commission for a hearing upon discharge, or reduction of classification or compensation, the commission grants a hearing to the officer as though he has been reduced in compensation, and the rules then provide that the contested-case proceedings of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act must be following. Keslar v. Police Civil Serv. Comm'n, 665 P.2d 937,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1983).

Applied

in

C F & I Steel Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 492 P.2d 529,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1972); Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976); Board of County Comm'rs v. Teton County Youth Servs., Inc., 652 P.2d 400,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1982); Gold v. Board of County Comm'rs, 658 P.2d 690,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1983); Lentsch v. Marshall, 741 F.2d 301,

1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 19631

(10th Cir. 1984); Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Bryant, 704 P.2d 1311,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 546

(Wyo. 1985); Foster's Inc. v. City of Laramie, 718 P.2d 868,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 541

(Wyo. 1986); Hooten v. State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 751 P.2d 1323,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1988); Montana Dakota Utils. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 847 P.2d 978,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1993); Wesaw v. Quality Maintenance, 2001 WY 17, 19 P.3d 500,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2001).

Quoted

in

Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983); Campbell County v. Wyoming Community College Comm'n, 731 P.2d 1174,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 388

(Wyo. 1987); Teton Valley Ranch v. State Bd. of Equalization, 735 P.2d 107,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 429

(Wyo. 1987); Lucero v. Mathews, 901 P.2d 1115,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1995); Weaver v. Cost Cutters, 953 P.2d 851,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1998).

Stated

in

In re Application for Certificate of Need by HCA Health Serv., 689 P.2d 108,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 340

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Pioneer Canal Co., 464 P.2d 533,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1970); Shenefield v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 544 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1976); Ebzery v. City of Sheridan, 982 P.2d 1251,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1999); Ireland v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Comp. Div., 998 P.2d 398,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2000); RT Communs., Inc. v. PSC, 2003 WY 145, 79 P.3d 36,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2003); Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005); Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Guthrie, 2005 WY 79, 115 P.3d 1086,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(2005); Tarraferro v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n., 2005 WY 155, 123 P.3d 912,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(2005); Decker v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n, 2005 WY 160, 124 P.3d 686,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(2005); Bd. of Trs. Fremont County Sch. Dist. #25 v. BM, 2006 WY 23, 129 P.3d 317,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. Mar. 7, 2006).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment on Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976), see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1977).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Privilege as to communications between lay representative in judicial or administrative proceedings and client, 31 ALR4th 1226.

Right to statement of reasons, under Administrative Procedure Act (5 USC § 555(e)), for denial of written application, petition, or other request of interested person made in connection with agency proceeding, 57 ALR Fed 765.

Authority of federal agency to spend public funds to reimburse expenses of qualified participants in its proceedings, 62 ALR Fed 849.